Utah statutes.
58-67-403.   Revocation of license -- Nondisciplinary.

Revocation by the division of a license under Subsection 58-67-302(1)(e) for failure to continue on a resident training program for reasons other than unprofessional or unlawful conduct is a nondisciplinary action and may not be reported by the division as a disciplinary action against the licensee.

